Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB598.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 337 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An employer with fifty (50) or more employees shall provide twelve (12) weeks of
paid leave for an employee upon the birth of a child, including by a surrogate, or
the adoption of a child under the age of six (6) if the employee has been employed
by the employer for at least one (1) year.
(2) Paid leave under this section shall:
(a) Be provided irrespective of the employer's leave policies; and
(b) Include paternity leave.
(3) An employee may voluntarily waive the paid leave required by this section by
returning to work before the twelve (12) weeks have elapsed.
(4) The secretary of the Education and Labor Cabinet may promulgate
administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to
implement this section for private sector employment.
(5) The secretary of the Personnel Cabinet may promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A necessary to implement this
section for public sector employment.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/14/2025 8:34 AM Jacketed